Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.430

Cost disclosure to health care providers.

The registered or licensed pharmacist under this chapter shall establish and maintain a procedure for disclosing to physicians and other health care providers with prescriptive authority information detailed by prescriber, of the cost and dispensation of all prescriptive medications prescribed by him or her for his or her patients on request. These charges should be made available on at least a quarterly basis for all requested patients and should include medication, dosage, number dispensed, and the cost of the prescription. Pharmacies may provide this information in a summary form for each prescribing physician for all patients rather than as individually itemized reports. All efforts should be made to utilize the existing computerized records and software to provide this information in the least costly format.

[ 2000 c 171 s 22; 1993 c 492 s 267.]

NOTES:

Cost containment—1993 c 492: "The legislature finds that the spiraling costs of health care continue to surmount efforts to contain them, increasing at approximately twice the inflationary rate. One of the fastest growing segments of the health care expenditure involves prescription medications. By making physicians and other health care providers with prescriptive authority more aware of the cost consequences of health care treatments for consumers, these providers may be inclined to exercise more restraint in providing only the most relevant and cost-beneficial drug and medication treatments. The requirement of the pharmacy to inform physicians and other health care providers of the charges of prescription drugs and medications that they order may have a positive effect on containing health costs. Further, the option of the physician or other health care provider to inform the patient of these charges may strengthen the necessary dialogue in the provider-patient relationship that tends to be diminished by intervening third-party payers." [ 1993 c 492 s 266.]

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.